Rhode Island, session 2025, SB750.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-56-22 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-56 entitled "Corrections
Department" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-56-22. Labor by persons committed on mesne process or to answer criminal
charge.
(a) Every person who shall be committed to the adult correctional institutions to answer for
any criminal offense, whether convicted or awaiting trial, or on mesne process in any qui tam or
penal action, or on mesne process or execution in any civil action, may be permitted to labor in the
discretion of the director, or the director’s designee, for the state, and in that case may be paid not
more than three dollars ($3.00) five dollars ($5.00) a day for every day the person shall labor with
the express consent of the director, or the director’s designee, of the department, to be credited to
the prisoner’s account by the assistant director of administration, or the assistant director’s
designee, and to be disbursed to the prisoner in accordance with the rules and regulations of the
institutions; provided, further, however, there shall be maintained on account at all times at least
twenty-five percent (25%) of the earnings of each prisoner up to a maximum of one hundred dollars
($100) for those persons serving a sentence of life imprisonment without parole under §§ 11-23-2,
12-19.2-1 et seq., and up to a maximum of two thousand dollars ($2,000) for all other prisoners;
those funds to be turned over to the prisoner at the time of the prisoner’s release from the institution,
the funds being the prisoner’s property; the moneys to be paid to the prisoner by order of the
assistant director of management services upon the general treasurer.

(b) Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the use of the funds in the account for
the payment of any court fees and court costs required to be paid for the filing, prosecution, and
defense of any action.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000805
========
LC000805 - Page 2 of 3